Arkansas, session 2025, SB149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) It is the duty of the General Assembly to provide a suitable
and efficient free public education to the students of Arkansas;
(2) Acts 2023, No. 237, the "LEARNS Act", ensured that public
school teachers receive a minimum salary of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000)
and that public school teachers with salaries above fifty thousand dollars
($50,000) receive a raise in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000);
(3) The House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on
Education, meeting jointly, determined through the adequacy review process
the foundation funding amounts to meet the obligation of the General Assembly
to provide a suitable and efficient free public education to students; and
(4) The 2025-2026 school year foundation funding amount
recommended and adopted by the General Assembly includes three hundred twenty
dollars ($320) to pay the minimum employer contribution for participants in
the state-sponsored insurance program that public school districts pay and
*TNL156*
04-08-2025 10:31:14 TNL156

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 SB149
that ultimately is paid to the Employee Benefits Division.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to:
(1) Provide funding to assist public school districts to meet
salary requirements enacted by the LEARNS Act;
(2) Create a more efficient process of funding;
(3) Gradually phase out teacher salary equalization funding to
increase the average teacher salary in Arkansas public schools and transfer
the funds to be used to assist in meeting the minimum teacher compensation
requirements under § 6-17-2403;
(4) Deduct the minimum employer contribution for participants in
the state-sponsored insurance program from the 2026-2027 foundation funding
amount; and
(5) Direct the Department of Education to pay the employer
contribution rate in the amount of three hundred thirty-three dollars ($333)
directly to the Employee Benefits Division on behalf of public school
districts.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2305(a)(2), concerning per-student
foundation funding amounts under the Public School Funding Act of 2003, is
amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) For the 2023-2024 2025-2026 school year, the foundation
funding amount is equal to seven thousand six hundred eighteen dollars
($7,618) eight thousand one hundred sixty-two dollars ($8,162), which
includes three hundred twenty dollars ($320) for the minimum employer
contribution for participants in the state-sponsored insurance program,
multiplied by the school district's average daily membership for the previous
school year.
(B) For the 2024-2025 2026-2027 school year and each
school year thereafter, the foundation funding amount is equal to seven
thousand seven hundred seventy-one dollars ($7,771) eight thousand thirty-
seven dollars ($8,037), which does not include three hundred thirty-three
dollars ($333) for the minimum employer contribution for participants in the
state-sponsored insurance program that will be paid directly to the Employee
Benefits Division on behalf of public schools, multiplied by the school
district's average daily membership for the previous school year.

04-08-2025 10:31:14 TNL156

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 SB149
SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2305(b)(2)(A), concerning alternative
learning environment funding under the Public School Funding Act of 2003, is
amended to read as follows:
(A)(i) For the 2023-2024 2025-2026 school year,
alternative learning environment funding shall be four thousand nine hundred
eighty-seven dollars ($4,987) five thousand two hundred twelve dollars
($5,212) multiplied by the number of identified alternative learning
environment students enrolled during the previous school year.
(ii) For the 2024-2025 2026-2027 school year,
alternative learning environment funding shall be five thousand eighty-six
dollars ($5,086) five thousand three hundred forty-one dollars ($5,341)
multiplied by the number of identified alternative learning environment
students enrolled during the previous school year.
(iii) Funding for students in alternative learning
environments shall be distributed based on rules promulgated by the State
Board of Education.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2305(b)(3), concerning funding for
English learners under the Public School Funding Act of 2003, is amended to
read as follows:
(3)(A) For the 2023-2024 2025-2026 school year, funding for
students who are identified as English learners shall be three hundred sixty-
six dollars ($366) three hundred seventy-five dollars ($375) for each
identified English learner.
(B) Funding for English learners shall be distributed to
public school districts for students who have been identified as not
proficient in the English language based upon a state-approved English
proficiency assessment instrument.
(C) Funds allocated for English learners to public school
districts under this subchapter shall be expended only for eligible
activities as identified in current rules promulgated by the State Board of
Education and are a supplement to funding for national school lunch students
provided in subdivision (b)(4) of this section.
(D) For the 2024-2025 2026-2027 school year and each
school year thereafter, funding for students who are identified as English
learners shall be three hundred sixty-six dollars ($366) three hundred
04-08-2025 10:31:14 TNL156

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 SB149
eighty-four dollars ($384) for each identified English learner.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2305(b)(4)(A), concerning Enhanced
Student Achievement funding under the Public School Funding Act of 2003, is
amended to read as follows:
(4)(A) Enhanced Student Achievement Funding for each identified
national school lunch student shall be as follows:
(i) For a public school district in which ninety
percent (90%) or more of the previous school year's enrolled students are
national school lunch students, the amount of per-student Enhanced Student
Achievement Funding for the 2023-2024 2025-2026 school year is one thousand
six hundred thirteen dollars ($1,613) one thousand six hundred fifty-three
dollars ($1,653) and for the 2024-2025 2026-2027 school year is one thousand
six hundred thirteen dollars ($1,613) one thousand six hundred ninety-four
dollars ($1,694);
(ii) For a public school district in which at least
seventy percent (70%) but less than ninety percent (90%) of the previous
school year's enrolled students are national school lunch students, the
amount of per-student Enhanced Student Achievement Funding for the 2023-2024
2025-2026 school year is one thousand seventy-six dollars ($1,076) one
thousand one hundred three dollars ($1,103) and for the 2024-2025 2026-2027
school year is one thousand seventy-six dollars ($1,076) one thousand one
hundred thirty dollars ($1,130); and
(iii) For a public school district in which less
than seventy percent (70%) of the previous school year's enrolled students
are national school lunch students, the amount of per-student Enhanced
Student Achievement Funding for the 2023-2024 2025-2026 school year is five
hundred thirty-eight dollars ($538) five hundred fifty-one dollars ($551) and
for the 2024-2025 2026-2027 school year is five hundred thirty-eight dollars
($538) five hundred sixty-five dollars ($565).

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2305(b)(5)(C)(i), concerning
professional development funding for professional learning communities under
the Public School Funding Act of 2003, is amended to read as follows:
(C)(i) For the 2023-2024 2025-2026 school year and
each school year thereafter, additional funding up to sixteen million five
04-08-2025 10:31:14 TNL156

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 SB149
hundred thousand dollars ($16,500,000) provided for professional development
above the amount in subdivision (b)(5)(A) of this section shall be used by
the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education for the development and
administration of professional learning communities for the benefit of public
school districts.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2305(b)(6)(A), concerning the
statewide target average annual salary for teachers under the Public School
Funding Act of 2003, is amended to read as follows:
(6)(A)(i) Beginning with the 2021-2022 school year, for school
districts identified by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education as
having an average annual teacher salary below the statewide target average
annual salary, teacher salary equalization funding shall be equal to one
hundred eight-five dollars ($185) the amount established in subdivisions
(6)(A)(ii)-(iv) of this section multiplied by the average daily membership of
the school district for the previous school year.
(ii) For the 2023-2024 and 2024-2025 school years
2025-2026 school year, the statewide target average annual salary shall be
fifty-one thousand eight hundred twenty-two dollars ($51,822) and teacher
salary equalization funding shall be one hundred eight-five dollars ($185).
(iii) The House Committee on Education and the
Senate Committee on Education shall set jointly the statewide target average
annual salary for the 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 school years, and each biennium
thereafter, as part of the adequacy review process required under § 10-3-2102
For the 2026-2027 school year, the statewide average annual salary shall be
fifty-one thousand eight hundred twenty-two dollars ($51,822) and teacher
salary equalization funding shall be one hundred dollars ($100).
(iv) For the 2027-2028 school year, the statewide
average annual salary shall be fifty-one thousand eight hundred twenty-two
dollars ($51,822) and teacher salary equalization funding shall be fifty
dollars ($50).

/s/J. English



04-08-2025 10:31:14 TNL156